epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sl.xml
	<patterns>
		.av5r
		.di6spo
		.ek3s
		.ek5v
		.is1
		.iz1
		.obi4d
		.ob5it
		.od1
		.po4d5n
		.po4v5s
		.pre6d7n
		.se4k5s
		.si4s
		.st4
		.voz5l
		.voz5n
		.zliz6
		a1a
		a1b
		ab5ba
		ab6rod
		a1c
		ac5ci
		a1č
		a1d
		ad2l
		a6dobl
		ad6rl.
		ad6rla
		ad6rob
		ad5ur
		a1e1
		a1f
		af5ga
		af1t
		a1g
		a1h
		a4hm
		ah5mi
		ah5mo
		a1i
		ai2n1
		a1j
		a4j5ek
		a4jf
		aj5fi
		aj5fo
		aj5ha
		aj5he
		aj5im
		aj6imo
		aj3os
		aj6stb
		a5ju.
		aj3uč
		aj3ug
		aj5žn
		a1k
		ak4s
		a4kst
		a1l
		a1m
		a4mz
		a1n
		an6dga
		an6dhi
		a4nm
		an5mi
		an5zi
		a1o
		ao2b1
		a1p
		a4ph
		a1ra
		ar6dwa
		a1re
		a1ri
		a1ro
		a1ru
		ar5xa
		ar5xo
		ar5xu
		a1s
		a4sš
		as5šč
		a1š
		a1t
		a4tf
		at4i
		a1u1
		a4uf
		a2uk
		a4ul
		a1v
		av5ši
		a4vž
		av5ža
		ay5to
		a1ze
		az5fo
		a4zig
		az3la
		az3le
		az4lil
		az4lit
		az4liv
		a4zob
		a4z3oč
		az5ora
		az5oro
		a4zra
		az4red
		az5vp
		a1ž
		až5mi
		ba6bba
		ban3č4
		ba4u
		2b1c
		2b1č
		2b1d
		be1
		be4v
		b1h
		bi1
		b1ja
		b4ja.
		b5jel
		b3jem
		b5jet
		2b1k
		b3lep
		b5leta
		b5lil
		b5lit
		b5liv
		b1m
		4bmi
		2b1n
		bo1
		bo6chm
		b5ord
		bo5vp
		b3rab
		b5ras
		b3raš
		b3rez
		bre4zg
		bre4zi
		bre4zr
		b5reže
		b3rob
		br6žda
		2b1s
		2b1š
		2b1t
		bu5ki
		bu5ku
		bu5kv
		bu5ry
		2b1v
		b1z
		b1ž
		2cc
		2ch.
		ch5ma
		2ck
		c1ka
		ck1o2
		c5ko.
		ckov3
		ck1s
		ck5we
		2c1n
		2c1t
		2č1b
		2č1g
		či1
		1čj
		2č1k
		1čl
		4č3let
		č5mes
		2č1n
		4čop
		2č1p
		2č1s
		4čup
		2d1b
		2d1c
		2d1č
		2d1d
		dd6voj
		d2e
		6d5elem
		de4min
		de4mn
		de4z3i
		2d1g
		2d1h
		di5ck
		4dind
		d4i5no
		dis1
		di4skr
		di6spr
		2d1j
		2d1k
		5dlet
		d2li
		d5lit
		d5liv
		d1lo
		2d3m
		4d3nac
		4d5nač
		4d5nap
		4d3nar
		4dnas
		4d5neb
		d5niv
		4d5niz
		4d5njač
		4d3nož
		d2o
		4dobč
		4d5obd
		2d3o2f
		do5rd
		do5vč
		do5v4z
		2d1p
		d5raz
		d3rep
		dre6pn
		d4rev
		2d1s
		2d1š
		2d1t
		dteks6
		d4ur
		du5ro
		du5um
		2d1v
		4d3vi
		2d1z2
		e1a
		e1b
		eb4j
		eb6liz
		e1c
		e1č
		e4čd
		eč5de
		eč5di
		eč5do
		eč3le
		eč5op
		e4čt
		eč5ti
		eč5to
		eč5tr
		eč5up
		e2č1v
		eč6vrs
		e1d
		e4df
		ed5ig
		ed2l
		ed5ob
		ed6obe
		ed6obr
		e4dobs
		e4d3oč
		ed5vč
		ed5zb
		e1e
		e4ep
		e1f
		e4ff
		ef5fe
		ef5ta
		e1g
		e1h
		e1i
		ei6pzi
		ei2z
		eiz5e
		e1j
		e1k
		ek6mal
		ek6tre
		e1l
		e1m
		e1n
		e1o1
		eob4j
		eob4r
		eo4dl
		eo4z5n
		e1p
		ep5nik
		e1ra
		era6z5l
		era5z4r
		era5z4v
		e1re
		e4rf
		e1ri
		e1ro
		e4rr
		e1ru
		e1s
		es5da
		e5sta
		e5sti.
		e5stih
		e5stil
		e1š
		e4šp
		eš5po
		e1t
		4eth
		e4tinš
		e1u1
		e1v
		eve6t5l
		ev5ha
		ev6pre
		ev6ste
		ev5stv
		2ew
		ew6ind
		ew5le
		e4wt
		ew5to
		e4yw
		e1z
		ez5dj
		e3z4dr
		ez2g
		ez5gl
		e5zij
		ez6ijo
		ez5imn
		e5zis
		ez6ist
		ez5iz
		ez4l
		ez6lom
		ez6man
		ez4mo
		e4zob
		e4z5or
		ez4re
		e4zt
		e4z5u4m5
		e4zž
		e1ž
		1fa
		fe1
		fe6ljt
		ff5ma
		fi6zlj
		2f1n
		fo6uri
		fre4u
		2f1s
		2ft
		ft5ve
		fu1
		2g1d
		ge6ige
		gel5č4
		ge6njč
		gi6tpr
		go1
		go5vz
		2g1t
		gu1
		ha4u
		2h1č
		he4i
		2h1k
		4hl.
		h4lo
		2h1n
		h5ren
		2h1š
		2h1t
		1hu
		hu6ffm
		i1a
		i1b
		i1c
		i4cs
		i1ča
		i1če
		i1či
		ič5ra
		i1ču
		ič5vr
		i1d
		4idor
		i1e1
		i1f
		i1g
		4igh
		i1h
		i1i
		ii2n1
		i1j
		i1k
		i4kč
		ik5ča
		i1l
		il5č4k
		4ile
		4ilo
		i1m
		i4mh
		im5hi
		i1n
		1ind
		2ine
		3i4n3os
		1inp
		3inse
		1inš
		4inšk
		3intr
		i1o1
		i1p
		i1r
		4ire
		i1s
		is4a
		is6ert
		isis4
		i4skv
		2iss
		i1š
		i1t
		it5pr
		i1u
		i1v
		iv5jo
		i1x
		i1z
		iz1l
		iz4la
		izli4z
		iz5me
		iz5mo
		iz6ode
		iz5po
		i2zr
		iz1u
		iz6ure
		i1ž
		j5akt
		2j1b
		2j1c
		2j1č
		2j1d
		je4ks4
		2j1g
		2jh
		j1hi
		4jime
		4j5int
		2j1k
		2j1l
		2j1m
		2j1n
		4job
		2j1od
		jod4l
		2jos
		4jož
		2j1p
		2j1r
		jra1
		jraz4
		2j1s
		jsis6t
		2j1š
		2j1t
		ju1
		2juč
		ju5dm
		2jus
		ju2ž1
		2j1v
		2j1z
		jz6ves
		2k1c
		2k1d
		ke5ti
		ki1
		2k1m
		1kn
		ko1
		kok4
		ko5kd
		ko6vše
		koz6lo
		1kre
		2ks.
		k5sat
		ks1c
		ks1p
		ks4po
		ks1t
		4kst.
		ks6taz
		ks5te
		2k1t
		3ktr
		4ktra
		ku5ro
		k5vip
		la4ir
		la6vz.
		2l1b
		2l1c
		2l1č
		2l1d
		le1
		le4e
		le6ipz
		le5me
		2l1f
		2l1g
		lg5ča
		2l1h
		l2i1
		li6dž.
		1liz
		4l5izd
		2lj.
		4ljc
		2ljč
		2ljk
		2ljn
		2ljs
		2ljš
		lju5d6j
		2l1k
		2l1l
		2l1m
		2l1n
		lo1
		1loč
		2l1p
		2l1s
		2l1š
		2l1t
		lu5ki
		lu5ku
		2l1v
		2l1z
		2l1ž
		2m1b
		2m1c
		2m1č
		2m1d
		me4d5n
		me6dos
		me4dr
		2m1f
		4mind
		4minp
		4minš
		mi6th.
		2m1k
		2m1m
		m5niv
		mo6št.
		mo6vš.
		2m1p
		2m1s
		2m1š
		2m1t
		m5urn
		2m1v
		my5hi
		2m1ž
		na1
		5načel
		na4d5nj
		nad5r
		na6dra
		na4dre
		na6dur
		1naj
		na6jak
		na4j5en
		naj3o
		na6joč
		na4j3u
		1nas
		na4v3z
		navze6
		1naz
		naz6or
		2n1b
		2n1c
		2nč
		n1ča
		n1če
		n1či
		n1ču
		2n3d2
		nd5ga
		nd5hi
		n4dm
		ne1
		ne3d2
		1neh
		ne3zm
		nez4v
		2n1f
		2n1g
		n4gh
		ng5ha
		n4gv
		ng5vi
		2n1h
		2nj.
		2njc
		nje4v5s
		2njk
		2njs
		2njš
		4njv
		2n1k
		2n1l
		2n1n
		no5rd
		n4ost
		2n1p
		2n1s
		nsis4
		2n1š
		2n1t
		nteks4
		n4tg
		nt5ga
		nt5ge
		n4tv
		nt5vi
		nu1
		2n1v
		ny5qu
		2n1z
		nz4i
		2n1ž
		o1a
		o4as
		o1b
		ob5gl
		ob5ide
		ob5jo
		5obla
		5obro
		o4bz
		o1c
		oc5ke
		oc5ki
		o4cr
		o1č
		o1d
		od5dv
		od5nal
		o6drep
		od5zd
		o2d1ž
		o1e
		oele4
		o1f
		o1g
		4ogl
		o1h
		o1i
		oiz2
		o1j
		o1k
		o4kb
		ok5ba
		ok5be
		o4kt
		o1l
		o6l5avt
		ol6gča
		o4lr
		ol5re
		o1m
		o1n
		o1o
		ood4l
		o2ol
		o4om
		o1p
		o4pm
		op5me
		4opy
		o1ra
		or4deč
		o1re
		o1ri
		o1ro
		o1ru
		o1s
		5oseb
		ose4m5
		o1š
		o1t
		o1u
		ou5ki
		ou5ku
		o1v
		ov5sem
		ov5šk
		o2v1z
		o5vza
		ov3zd
		o1y
		o1z
		oz4b
		ozd5j
		oz4g
		oz5lo
		oz6lož
		oz2n
		oz5nic
		oz5niš
		oz2o
		oz2r
		oz2v
		o1ž
		ož5mi
		2p1c
		2p3č2
		pč5ka
		pe1
		1peč
		pe4kt
		pet3l
		pe4tle
		pe4v5s
		pev5t4
		4phs
		ph5so
		pi5zo
		2p1k
		4ploz
		po1
		po6dfa
		po4d3l
		po4dna
		po4d5oč
		po6lob
		po6std
		prez4
		2p1s
		2p1š
		2p1t
		pz6ig.
		qu2
		3raču
		2rae
		ra6jžn
		rav5z
		ra6vza
		ra4z5id
		3razl
		ra4z5or
		2r1b
		2r1c
		2r1č
		2r1d
		re1
		3real
		re6cht
		re5čv
		5redč
		re6dig
		re6dnju
		re6iba
		re5jo
		re5km
		re6sda
		rev6sk
		re6znač
		re6zus
		re6zve
		r1f
		2r1g
		2r1h
		ri1
		r4in
		ri5n4o
		riz4g
		riz4l
		riz4n
		2r1j
		2r1k
		2r1l
		2r1m
		2r1n
		ro1
		rob6id
		3rodi
		ro5zo
		2r1p
		r1r
		2r1s
		2r1š
		2r1t
		r4th
		rt5ha
		ru5kl
		2r1v
		r3v2j
		rv5jo
		ry5an
		2r1z
		rz2l
		r1ž
		rž5da
		2s1b
		1sc
		4sc.
		s2ci
		se4k5sa
		sek5si
		se5ma
		se5vp
		2s1f
		si1
		s4id
		si6gn.
		sis1
		2s1j
		2sk.
		s2kn
		4skre
		s4lav
		s4on
		soni5
		sonič4
		1sp
		s4plod
		spod4l
		2s1s
		2st.
		3ste
		s4ten
		4stf
		s4tič
		5stim
		s4tir
		2stk
		2stm
		1str
		s4tra.
		su1
		su4bo
		sve5t
		š2č
		2šč.
		2ščk
		2ščn
		še2s
		2š1j
		ta5wi
		taz4
		2t1b
		2t1c
		tch5o
		2t1d
		tek6st
		5tema
		te5xa
		t1f
		4tind
		4tinos
		4tinp
		4tinse
		4t3int
		2t1k
		6tletno
		2t1m
		4tnaj
		to6vž.
		trt5u
		tr6tur
		2t1s
		2t1t
		tu1
		4tz.
		2u1a
		u1b
		ub4j
		u4bp
		ub5po
		u1c
		u1č
		u1d
		ud6mi.
		u1e
		u1f
		u1g
		u1h
		u1i
		u1j
		u1ka
		u1ke
		u1ko
		u1l
		u1m
		u1n
		u1p
		up6čka
		u1ra
		u1re
		4urg
		u1ri
		u1s
		1usp
		u1š
		uše3s
		u1t
		u4th
		uth5o
		u1v
		ux5em
		u1z
		u1ž
		2v1b
		2v1c
		2vč
		v1ča
		v1če
		v4čer
		v1či
		2v1d
		ve4čl
		ve4čm
		ve4i
		ve4tin
		vetle6t
		v1f
		v1g
		vi5dv
		vid6va
		1viv
		vi6žg.
		2v1j
		4vjo
		2v1k
		2v1m
		2v1n
		vo5rd
		voz5le
		2v1p
		3v2pa
		v4pij
		v4pil
		v5skn
		v5šek
		4všk
		2v1t
		vt4k
		vz2
		v2za
		3v2zg
		2v3zk
		2vzo
		v3zp
		v2zu
		1wa
		wo2
		x1f
		1ye
		2y1f
		y1j
		y1l
		y1w
		1z2a
		z6ane.
		za5uk
		za3vp
		za1z2
		za5zd
		2z1b
		3zbir
		z1c
		2z1č
		2z1d2
		zd5ju
		z3dv
		z1g
		z4gni
		z5got
		2z1h
		1zi
		z1ig
		2z1is
		4z5išč
		2z1j
		2z1k
		z3ku
		z5las
		z1li
		3zlil
		5zlit
		5zliv
		zliz5
		1zlj
		3zlog
		z5lom
		3zlož
		z1lu
		2z1m
		1zn
		1zo
		z1ob
		2z1od
		z1og
		z2ol
		z4om
		2z1p
		1z1r
		4zredč
		4zreš
		4zrez
		4zrež
		4zri
		4zru
		2z1s
		z1š
		z1t
		1zu
		z4uj
		2z1up
		2z1uz
		z1v2
		z4ven
		z3vn
		3z4voj
		z4vok
		2z1z2
		z1ž
		2ž1b
		2ž1c
		2ž1č
		2ž1j
		2ž1k
		4žmi
		.č8
		.š8
		.ž8
		8ž.
		8š.
		8č.
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
